Utah statutes.
73-18a-10.   Enforcement -- Inspection of vessels, marinas, and other
boating facilities.
Enforcement of this chapter or the rules promulgated under it shall be by law
enforcement officers. Any vessel in this state is subject to inspection by the
officers for the purpose of determining whether the vessel is equipped in
compliance with this chapter.  If the vessel is not so equipped, the division
may suspend its registration until the proper installation is completed or the
marine toilet is sealed in a manner which prohibits its use.  The division may
inspect marinas or other waterside public facilities used by vessels for
launching, docking, or mooring purposes to determine whether they are
adequately equipped for proper handling, storing, or disposal of waste,
litter, or human body waste.
